Utah statutes.
20A-1-201.   Date and purpose of regular general elections.

(1)  A regular general election shall be held throughout the state on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each even-numbered year.

(2)  At the regular general election, the voters shall:

(a)  choose persons to serve the terms established by law for the following offices:

(i)  electors of President and Vice President of the United States;

(ii)  United States Senators;

(iii)  Representatives to the United States Congress;

(iv)  governor, lieutenant governor, attorney general, state treasurer, and state auditor;

(v)  senators and representatives to the Utah Legislature;

(vi)  county officers;

(vii)  State School Board members;

(viii)  local school board members; and

(ix)  any elected judicial officers; and

(b)  approve or reject:

(i)  any proposed amendments to the Utah Constitution that have qualified for the ballot under procedures established in the Utah Code;

(ii)  any proposed initiatives or referenda that have qualified for the ballot under procedures established in the Utah Code; and

(iii)  any other ballot propositions submitted to the voters that are authorized by the Utah Code.

